Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2019
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2016. Corporate existence.

(1) Unless a delayed effective date is specified, the corporate existence shall begin when the articles of incorporation are filed.

(2) The Secretary of State's filing of the articles of incorporation shall be conclusive proof that the incorporators satisfied all conditions precedent to incorporation except in a proceeding by the state to cancel or revoke the incorporation or involuntarily dissolve the corporation.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 19.